Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,193
Grounds for administrative dissolution.

(MBCA 14.20) The Secretary
of State may commence a proceeding under section 21-2,194 to administratively
dissolve a corporation if:

(1) The corporation is without
a registered agent or registered office in this state for sixty days or more;

(2) The corporation does
not notify the Secretary of State within sixty days that its registered agent
or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned,
or that its registered office has been discontinued; or

(3) The corporation's period
of duration stated in its articles of incorporation expires.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 193.